Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202280-321
Member; payment for care; public expense.

Nothing in the Nebraska Veterans Services Act shall be construed to deny any person who has been properly admitted to one of the Nebraska veterans homes the privilege of paying the cost of his or her care, or any part thereof, if he or she so desires or if it has been determined by the Veterans' Homes Board that his or her financial status is such that he or she should no longer be maintained there at public expense.

Laws 1891, c. 49, § 7, p. 346;

Laws 1909, c. 134, § 1, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 7306;

C.S.1922, § 6961;

C.S.1929, § 80-305;

R.S.1943, § 80-305;

Laws 1949, c. 272, § 5, p. 895;

Laws 1971, LB 334, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-308;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 724;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 9.